District of Columbia statutes.
46-251.02

Use of medical support notice; IV-D agency.

(a)

In cases being enforced pursuant to Part D of Title IV of the Social Security Act, approved January 4, 1975 (88 Stat. 2351; 42 U.S.C. § 651 et seq.), where a parent is required by a support order to provide health insurance coverage for a child, which is available through the parent’s employer, the IV-D agency may apply for the enrollment of the child in the health insurance coverage by submitting a medical support notice to the employer. The IV-D agency shall, where appropriate, submit a medical support notice to the employer when the support order requires the noncustodial parent to provide health insurance coverage for the child and the employer is known to the IV-D agency, unless the support order directs enrollment of the child in alternative coverage.

(b)

Where a noncustodial parent is a newly hired employee entered in the District of Columbia Directory of New Hires pursuant to § 46-226.06, and the support order requires the noncustodial parent to provide health insurance coverage for a child, the IV-D agency shall submit the medical support notice to the employer within 2 business days after the entry of the employee in the directory.

(c)

The IV-D agency shall promptly notify an employer that has received a medical support notice when there is no longer a support order in effect for which the IV-D agency is responsible that requires a parent to provide health insurance coverage for a child.

Mar. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-130, § 102, 51 DCR 1615
This section is referenced in § 1-307.42.
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 102 of Medical Support Establishment and Enforcement Temporary Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-238, March 25, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 2751).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 102 of Medical Support Establishment and Enforcement Temporary Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 15-84, March 10, 2004, law notification 51 DCR 3376).
For temporary (90 day) addition of this section, see § 102 of Medical Support Establishment and Enforcement Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-485, October 3, 2002, 49 DCR 9631).
For temporary (90 day) addition of this section, see § 102 of Medical Support Establishment and Enforcement Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-600, January 7, 2003, 50 DCR 664).
For temporary (90 day) addition of this section, see § 102 of Medical Support Establishment and Enforcement Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-208, October 24, 2003, 50 DCR 9856).
For temporary (90 day) addition of this section, see § 102 of Medical Support Establishment and Enforcement Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-330, January 28, 2004, 51 DCR 1603).